es: Tipo de acabado de la cremallera: Extremo cerrado (no separable); Extremo abierto (separable); Pin y caja (extremo separable); Separable de dos vías; Otro
zh-CN: 拉链末端类型: 闭尾（不可分）; 开尾（可分）; 插销和方块（可分开尾）; 双向可分; 其他
el: Τύπος στοπ φερμουάρ: Κλειστό άκρο (μη διαχωριζόμενο); Ανοιχτό άκρο (διαχωριζόμενο); Ακροδέκτης και υποδοχή (διαχωριζόμενο άκρο); Διαχωριζόμενο δύο κατευθύνσεων; Άλλο
hr-HR: Vrsta kraja patentnog zatvarača: Zatvoren kraj (ne razdvaja se); Otvoren kraj (razdvaja se); Zatik i kutijica (razdvojivi kraj); Dvosmjerno razdvajanje; Ostalo
lt-LT: Užtrauktuko galo tipas: Uždaras (neatskiriamas); Atviras (atskiriamas); Kištukas ir dėžutė (atskiriantis galas); Dvipusis atskiriamas; Kita
th: แบบซิปปิดปลาย: ปลายปิด (แยกไม่ได้); ปลายเปิด (แยกได้); หมุดและกล่อง (ปลายแยกได้); แยกได้สองทาง; อื่นๆ
hu: Cipzárvég típusa: Zárt végű (nem bontható); Nyitott végű (bontható); Tű és doboz (bontható vég); Kétirányú bontható; Egyéb
de: Endtyp des Reißverschlusses: Geschlossen (nicht teilbar); Offen (teilbar); Einsteckteil & Kastenteil (teilbares Ende); Zweiwege-teilbar; Sonstige
vi: Loại đầu khóa kéo: Đầu kín (không tách rời); Đầu mở (tách rời); Chốt & hộp (đầu tách rời); Tách rời hai chiều; Khác
da: Endetype for lynlås: Lukket ende (ikke-delbar); Åben ende (delbar); Stift og kasse (delbar ende); Tovejs delbar; Andet
pt-BR: Zíper tipo de extremidade: Fundo fechado (não destacável); Fundo aberto (destacável); Pino e caixa (fundo destacável); Destacável bidirecional; Outros
zh-TW: 拉鍊末端類型: 閉尾 (不可分); 開尾 (可分); 插銷與方塊 (開尾); 雙向開尾; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de capăt al fermoarului: Cu capăt închis (nedetașabil); Cu capăt deschis (detașabil); Pin și casetă (capăt detașabil); Detașabil în două direcții; Altele
en: Zipper end type: Closed-end (non-separating); Open-end (separating); Pin & box (separating end); Two-way separating; Other
pl: Typ zakończenia zamka błyskawicznego: Zamknięty (nierozdzielczy); Otwarty (rozdzielczy); Trzpień i pudełeczko (rozdzielczy); Rozdzielczy dwukierunkowy; Inne
fi: Vetoketjun pään tyyppi: Umpinainen (ei-avautuva); Avoin (avautuva); Pistoke ja rasia (avautuva pää); Kaksisuuntainen avautuva; Muu
sk-SK: Typ ukončenia zipsu: Uzavretý (nedeliteľný); Otvorený (deliteľný); Kolík a škatuľka (deliteľný koniec); Obojsmerný deliteľný; Iné
fr: Type d’extrémité de la fermeture éclair: Fermé (non séparable); Ouvert (séparable); Boîtier et manchon (bout séparable); Séparable à double sens; Autre
sv: Typ av ändavslutning för dragkedja: Stängd botten (icke-delbar); Öppen botten (delbar); Tapp och låda (delbar botten); Tvåvägs delbar; Övrigt
bg-BG: Тип край на ципа: Затворен край (неразделящ се); Отворен край (разделящ се); Щифт и кутия (разделящ се край); Двупосочно разделящ се; Други
ja: ファスナーエンドタイプ: クローズエンド (非分離型); オープンエンド (分離型); ピン & ボックス (分離端); 2 ウェイ分離型; その他
nb: Type glidelåsende: Lukket ende (ikke-delbar); Åpen ende (delbar); Stift og boks (delbar ende); Toveis delbar; Annet
tr: Fermuar ucu tipi: Kapalı uçlu (ayrılmaz); Açık uçlu (ayrılabilir); Pim ve kutu (ayrılabilir uç); İki yönlü ayrılabilir; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de extremidade do fecho de correr: Fechado (não separável); Aberto (separável); Pino e caixa (extremidade separável); Separável em duas direções; Outro
nl: Ritssluiting uiteinde type: Gesloten einde (niet-deelbaar); Open einde (deelbaar); Pin en doosje (deelbaar einde); Tweeweg deelbaar; Overig
ru: Тип окончания молнии: Неразъемная; Разъемная; Штифт и гнездо (разъемный конец); Двухзамковая разъемная (двухсторонняя); Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta zaključka zadrge: Zaprto (neločljivo); Odprto (ločljivo); Zatič in škatlica (ločljiv konec); Dvosmerno ločljivo; Drugo
ko: 지퍼 끝 유형: 닫힌 양끝(분리 불가); 열린 양끝(분리 가능); 핀 및 박스(분리형 끝); 양방향 분리형; 기타
it: Tipo di chiusura della cerniera: Chiusa (non separabile); Aperta (separabile); Perno e scatolino (estremità separabile); Separabile a doppio cursore; Altro
cs: Typ zakončení zipu: Uzavřený (nedělitelný); Otevřený (dělitelný); S krabičkou a trnem (dělitelný konec); Dvoucestný dělitelný; Jiné